Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2646
General duty of conservator.

In the exercise of his or her powers, a conservator is to act as a fiduciary and shall comply with the prudent investor rule set forth in sections 30-3883 to 30-3889.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 264, UPC § 5-417;

Laws 1997, LB 54, § 15;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 132.